Texas, session 892, SB49.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  The amount of $5,756,567.46 is appropriated from the general revenue fund to Galveston County for the two-year period beginning on the effective date of this Act to reimburse the county for legal expenses incurred in litigating the case of Petteway v. Galveston County, 111 F.4th 596 (5th Cir. 2024). SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.